Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1716
Support, defined.

Support shall mean the providing of necessary shelter, food, clothing, care, medical support, medical attention, education expenses, funeral expenses, or any other reasonable and necessary expense.

Laws 1985, Second Spec. Sess., LB 7, § 36;

Laws 1991, LB 457, § 24.